Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.705

Identification of previously fabricated prostheses.

Any removable prosthesis in existence before July 26, 1987, that was not marked in accordance with RCW 18.32.695 at the time of its fabrication, shall be so marked at the time of any subsequent rebasing.

[ 1987 c 252 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.32.324.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 252: See note following RCW 18.32.695.